Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
ARTICLE 25
PUBLIC ESTABLISHMENTS

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2017. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

PART 1 HOTELS AND RESTAURANTS

PART 2 INNKEEPERS' RIGHTS